Ohio, session 136, HB812.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.929 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.929. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise, the eastbound and westbound lanes of state route number seven hundred fifty between United States route number twenty-three and the point where east Powell road splits from state route number seven hundred fifty, in Delaware county, shall be known as the "Anastasia Jehorek Memorial Highway." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers along the highway indicating its name.